Maryland, session 2025, HB0752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 41. COMMISSION ON STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT REAL PROPERTY
BEARING CONFEDERATE NAMES.
9–4101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0752*

HOUSE BILL 752
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE COMMISSION ON STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT REAL PROPERTY BEARING CONFEDERATE NAMES.
(C) “CONFEDERATE NAME” MEANS A NAME THAT COMMEMORATES THE
CONFEDERATE STATES OF AMERICA OR ANY PERSON WHO SERVED VOLUNTARILY
WITH THE CONFEDERATE STATES OF AMERICA.
(D) “POLITICAL SUBDIVISION” MEANS:
(1) A COUNTY;
(2) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION;
(3) AN UNINCORPORATED TOWN;
(4) A SCHOOL DISTRICT; OR
(5) A SPECIAL DISTRICT.
(E) “REAL PROPERTY” INCLUDES STREETS, BUILDINGS, PARKS, AND
SUBDIVISIONS.
9–4102.
(A) THERE IS A COMMISSION ON STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT REAL
PROPERTY BEARING CONFEDERATE NAMES.
(B) THE COMMISSION IS AN INDEPENDENT UNIT IN THE EXECUTIVE
BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
9–4103.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF 24 MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR WITH THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE.
(2) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF EACH
COUNTY.
(B) THE GOVERNOR MAY REMOVE A MEMBER FOR INCOMPETENCE OR
MISCONDUCT.
9–4104.
THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT ANNUALLY A CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR FROM
AMONG ITS MEMBERS.

HOUSE BILL 752 3
9–4105.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY.
(2) IN ADDITION TO MEETING AT LEAST QUARTERLY, THE
COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT THE DISCRETION OF THE CHAIR OR THE GOVERNOR.
(B) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
9–4106.
(A) (1) WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE GOVERNOR, THE COMMISSION
SHALL APPOINT A DIRECTOR.
(2) THE DIRECTOR MAY NOT BE A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION.
(3) THE DIRECTOR SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE COMMISSION,
SUBJECT TO CONCURRENCE OF THE GOVERNOR.
(B) (1) THE DIRECTOR IS A SPECIAL APPOINTMENT IN THE STATE
PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM.
(2) THE DIRECTOR SHALL BE PAID A SALARY OF $80,000 ANNUALLY.
(C) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION OF $80,000 FOR THE SALARY OF THE DIRECTOR.
9–4107.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A FRAMEWORK TO IDENTIFY REAL
PROPERTY BEARING A CONFEDERATE NAME THAT IS OWNED BY THE STATE OR A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION; AND
(2) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE REAL PROPERTY
THAT SHOULD BE RENAMED.

HOUSE BILL 752
(B) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2032, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT ITS
FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAYOR AND CITY
COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY, THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH COUNTY, AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE THE
COMMISSION TO RENAME REAL PROPERTY OWNED BY THE STATE OR A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION.
9–4108.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY SEEK MONEY FROM THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT, FOUNDATIONS, AND PRIVATE SOURCES IN ADDITION TO STATE
FINANCING.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT GIFTS, GRANTS, DONATIONS,
BEQUESTS, OR ENDOWMENTS FOR ANY OF ITS PURPOSES.
(B) MONEY RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND
INCOME AND FEES DERIVED FROM EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS AND ACTIVITIES OF
THE COMMISSION ARE NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) MONEY MAINTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO AUDIT BY
THE STATE, INCLUDING THE LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 7 years and, at the end of June 30, 2033,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.